Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 3.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1075.02
Certified seed potatoes, defined.

Certified seed potatoes means seed potatoes which have been certified by a certification entity recognized by the department to certify that the seed potatoes are free of regulated plant pests.

Laws 2008, LB791, § 3.